Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,135
Commercial motor vehicle driver training; human trafficking training; required; curriculum and training materials; Attorney General; powers and duties.

(1) For purposes of this section, commercial motor vehicle driver training means any training course or educational program that is offered in this state for the purpose of teaching or training any person how to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

(2) The curriculum for any commercial motor vehicle driver training that begins on or after January 1, 2027, shall include a minimum of thirty minutes of human trafficking training as prescribed by the Attorney General.

(3)(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the Attorney General shall prescribe the curriculum and training materials for the human trafficking training that is required under subsection (2) of this section.

(b) The Attorney General shall review and update such curriculum and training materials at least once every three years to account for changes and trends in human trafficking.

(4) The Attorney General may collaborate with any organization that specializes in and offers training materials about the recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking for commercial motor vehicle drivers.

(5) The Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 76.
July 18, 2026